Massachusetts, session 194th, H1147.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The fifth sentence of the third paragraph of section 51 of chapter 112 is hereby amended
by striking out the words “by Medicaid but except as required by federal Medicaid law, shall not
seek reimbursement from any other insurance or third party payor”.
of 1